Tennessee, session 114, SB1897.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Title 39, Chapter 17, Part 13, is amended by
adding the following new section:
Notwithstanding another law to the contrary, in consideration that the right to
keep and bear arms is protected and reserved to the people in Article I, § 26, of the
Constitution of Tennessee, a person who has not been convicted of a violent, felony
crime and who is lawfully able to own or to possess a firearm under the Constitution of
Tennessee is considered to be individually licensed and verified by this state within the
meaning of the provisions regarding individual licensure and verification in the federal
Gun-Free School Zones Act.
SECTION 2. This act takes effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it.
SB1897
011094
- 1 -